src/verb-kom-morph.txt
! ====================================== !
!        Verbal morphology               !
! ====================================== !


! Closed class verbs
! ------------------

LEXICON VERBNEGATIVE
!Present Neg
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ог MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg2:он MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Sg3:оз MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:огӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:онӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl1:огӧй MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl2:онӧй MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prs+Pl3:оз MatrixVerb-Comparison ;

!Past Neg
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg1:эг MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg2:эн MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Sg3:эз MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl1:эг MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl2:эн MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl1:эгӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl2:энӧ MatrixVerb-Comparison ;
оз+V+Neg+Ind+Prt+Pl3:эз MatrixVerb-Comparison ;

!Imperative
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:эн K ;
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:эн K ;
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:энӧ K ;
!A tag is needed to indicate this clitic-like лы segment
оз+V+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:энлы K ;

!Final
моз+V+Neg+Final+1:мог K ; ! мед ог _so that I/we won't_
моз+V+Neg+Final+2:мон K ; ! мед он
моз+V+Neg+Final+3:моз K ; ! мед оз


! Open class verbs
! ----------------

! Some Flag diacritic lines are with regexes, other with aligned zeros. We want to migrate to
! regexes < … > , for readability reasons (sic!)

LEXICON Verb-lokny ! One verb only, локны
+V+Inf@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:%>ны@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+Inf+Px1@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@:%>ным@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+Inf+Px2@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@:%>ныд@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+Inf+Px3@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@:%>ныс@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+Inf+Px2+Acc@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@:%>нытӧ@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+Inf+Px3+Acc@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@:%>нысӧ@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+V+ConNeg+Pl3@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ны@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd ;
+V+ConNeg@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ VerbEnd ;
+V+Imprt+Sg2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd ;
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:%>т@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:%>т@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V:т  VerbConj ; !а



LEXICON Verb-ny ! янӧдны, контролируйтны. Ending in -дны, -тны, -Cны, -Vны.
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-nyDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V: VerbConj ; !а
+V: VerbConj-V ; !б

LEXICON Verb-yny ! ярмыны. Multiple-syllable verb ending in -ыны.
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Verb-ynyDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer ; !
+V@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:ы@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbDer-V ; !
+V: VerbConj ; ! check this!!!
+V:ы VerbConj-V ; ! check this!!!

! First model: ы added as part of the suffix in б
! суффикс а
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ышт, ан...
! ярм ------------/

! суффикс б
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ны, 
! ярм ----- ы ----/


! Second model: ы added earlier, and not as part of the suffix in б
! суффикс а
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ышт, ан...
! ярм ------------/

! суффикс б
! янӧд -----------\
!                   ыны, 
! ярм ------------/



! ================ !
! Verb conjugation !
! ================ !

LEXICON VerbConj-V ! суф б -- ы --
+Inf@U.CONJ-INF.YES@:%>ны@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+Inf+Px1@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@:%>ным@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+Inf+Px2@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@:%>ныд@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+Inf+Px3@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@:%>ныс@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+Inf+Px2+Acc@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@:%>нытӧ@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.2ACC@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+Inf+Px3+Acc@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@:%>нысӧ@U.CONJ-INF.YES@@U.CONJ-POSS.3ACC@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+ConNeg+Pl3@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ны@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd ;
+ConNeg@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ VerbEnd ;
+Imprt+Sg2@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd ;

LEXICON VerbConj ! суф а -------
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ Finiteforms ;
@U.CONJ-INF.YES@ Non-finiteforms ;

LEXICON Finiteforms  ! Gives linking vowels for 3 tenses
 present ;
 future ;
 preterite ;
 imperative ;

LEXICON present
+Ind+Prs@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@:%>а@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@ PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Present
+Ind+Prs@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@:%>ӧ@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRES@ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3

LEXICON future
+Ind+Fut@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@:%>а@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@ PresPret1 ; ! 1,2  Future
+Ind+Fut@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ас@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.FUT@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! 3 PresPret1-SgPl3   ХХХ check this

LEXICON preterite
+Ind+Prt1@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@:%>і@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@ PresPret1 ; 
+Ind+Prt1@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@:%>і@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@  P3 ; ! 3 
+Ind+Prt2@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@:%>ӧм@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET2@ Pret2a ;

LEXICON imperative
+Imprt+Pl2@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:%>ӧй@U.CONJ-MX.IMP@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd ;

LEXICON PossessiveSuffixes
+PxSg1-ym:%>ым K ;
            PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ;


LEXICON PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1
+NoPoss:     K ;
+PxSg2:%>ыд  K ;
+PxSg3:%>ыс  K ;
+PxPl1:%>ным K ;
+PxPl2:%>ныд K ;
+PxPl3:%>ныс K ;


LEXICON PresPret1  ! First and second person
+Sg1@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
+Sg2@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:%>н@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+Pl1@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@:%>м@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
+Pl1+Use/Sub@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@:%>мӧ@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
+Pl1@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@:%>мӧй@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;  ! imperatiivi / optatiivi ??
+Pl2@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:%>нныд@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+Pl2+Use/Sub@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:%>д@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; 

LEXICON P3         
@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>с@U.CONJ-PX.3@ PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! This is regular
@U.CONJ-PX.3@  PresPret1-SgPl3 ; ! This is usually restricted to intransitives


LEXICON PresPret1-SgPl3
  SG3 ; 
  PL3 ;
  
LEXICON SG3
+Sg3@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
  
LEXICON PL3
+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ны@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ны@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;

LEXICON Pret2a
:а PRET2-linkki-a ; 
   PRET2PL2 ; 
   PL3 ;   ! for continuation in different persons. 
                  !Could also have used the homonymic participle
                  ! as point of departure

LEXICON PRET2PL2
+Sg2@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:%>ыд@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+Pl2@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:%>ныд@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
+Pl2@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@:%>ныдӧсь@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.2@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; !224
+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ны@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; !227

LEXICON PRET2-linkki-a
!+Sg1+Use/Sub: VerbEnd-Comparison ; ! no Sg1 for Prt2 in the standard
+Sg1@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;  
+Sg3@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:@U.CONJ-NX.SG@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;
!+Pl1+Use/Sub:%>ӧсь VerbEnd-Comparison ; ! no Pl1 for Prt2 in the standard
+Pl1@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@:%>ӧсь@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.1@ VerbEnd-Comparison ; 
+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@:%>ӧсь@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ VerbEnd-Comparison ;

LEXICON MatrixVerb-Comparison
               K ;
+Der/моз:%>моз K ;
+Compar:%>джык K ;
+Der/кодь:%>кодь K ;

!This is where Serial verbs are made possible
LEXICON VerbEnd-Comparison
 Serial-Verbs ;
 MatrixVerb-Comparison ;

LEXICON VerbEnd
 Serial-Verbs ;
 # ;

LEXICON Serial-Verbs
+SerialVerb:- V-A2M ;
+SerialVerb:- V-N2END ;

! Derivation
! ==========

LEXICON Non-finiteforms
VerbDer ; ! to be merged with next
          !2011-11-02 dealing with serial verbs there may be
          ! reason to distinguish between V2V derivation and non-finite forms

LEXICON Verb-nyDer
  ! verb-to-verb
  ! This is fed by LEXICON Verb-ny, and therefore certain corrections
  ! must be made 2012-01-18
+Der/лы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:%>л@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@  Verb-yny ; !!босьтлыны
+Der/лывлы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:%>лывл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !!босьтлывлыны
+Der/сьы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:%>сь@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !! овсьыны
+Der/сьы+Der/ышт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:%>сьышт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !!вежсьыштны
+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:%>сьыштлывл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !! пусьыштлывлыны
+Der/сьы+Der/ышт+Der/лы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:%>сьыштл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !!?? пусьыштлыны
!!!!зь:зь  !!югзьыны
!! Why do the suffixes above have ">" marking
!! while the ones below do not?
+Der/чы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ч@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !!босьтчыны
+Der/чы+Der/л@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:чыл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !!дӧзмӧдчывны
+Der/чы+Der/ышт+Der/лы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:чыштл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !!босьтчыштлыны
+Der/чы+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:чыштлывл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ; !! босьтчыштлывлыны
+Der/ышт+Der/лы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ыштл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ;   !!сёйыштлыны
+Der/ышт+Der/лывлы@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ыштлывл@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-yny ;  !!сёйыштлывлыны
+Der/ышт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ышт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !!сёйыштны
+Der/чы+Der/ышт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:чышт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !!босьтчыштны
+Der/ал@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ал@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !!сетавны
+Der/овт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:овт@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !!пановтны
+Der/ась@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@:ась@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ Verb-ny ; !! босьтасьны

 
